North Carolina, session 2025, HB220.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a municipality may, upon
a finding that a fund balance in a utility or public service enterprise fund used for the operation
of a wastewater collection, treatment, and disposal system exceeds the requirements for funding
the operation of that fund, including closure and post-closure expenditures, transfer the excess
funds to be used to support the other services supported by the municipality's general fund. The
intent of this act is to authorize the transfer of funds and not to, in any way, affect the operation
of a wastewater collection, treatment, and disposal system.
SECTION 2. This act applies to the Town of Tabor City only.
SECTION 3. This act is effective when it becomes law.
*H220-v-1*